Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.030

Application—Exceptions.

(1) This chapter applies to all powers of attorney except:

(a) A power to the extent it is coupled with an interest in the subject of the power, including a power given to or for the benefit of a creditor in connection with a credit transaction;

(b) A proxy or other delegation to exercise voting rights or management rights with respect to an entity; and

(c) A power created on a form prescribed by a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality for a governmental purpose.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, RCW 11.125.170 shall not apply to a power to make health care decisions under RCW 11.125.400 and 11.125.410, nor shall it apply to the power to nominate a guardian for a minor child under RCW 11.125.410.

[ 2016 c 209 s 103.]